Illinois, session 104th, HB1418.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Cemetery Oversight Act is amended by 5changing Section 5-20 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 411/5-20)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)8    Sec. 5-20. Exemptions. 9    (a) Full exemption. Except as provided in this subsection, 10this Act does not apply to (1) any cemetery authority 11operating as a family burying ground or religious burying 12ground, (2) any cemetery authority that has not engaged in an 13interment, inurnment, or entombment of human remains within 14the last 10 years, or (3) any cemetery authority that is less 15than 3 acres. For purposes of determining the applicability of 16this subsection, the number of interments, inurnments, and 17entombments shall be aggregated for each calendar year. A 18cemetery authority claiming a full exemption shall apply for 19exempt status as provided for in Section 10-20 of this Act. A 20cemetery authority claiming a full exemption shall be subject 21to Sections 10-40, 10-55, and 10-60 of this Act. A cemetery 22authority that performs activities that would disqualify it 23from a full exemption is required to apply for licensure   HB1418- 2 -LRB104 07625 AAS 17669 b1within one year following the date on which its activities 2would disqualify it for a full exemption. A cemetery authority 3that previously qualified for and maintained a full exemption 4that fails to timely apply for licensure shall be deemed to 5have engaged in unlicensed practice and shall be subject to 6discipline in accordance with Article 25 of this Act.7    (b) Partial exemption. If a cemetery authority does not 8qualify for a full exemption and (1) engages in 25 or fewer 9interments, inurnments, or entombments of human remains for 10each of the preceding 2 calendar years, (2) operates as a 11public cemetery, or (3) operates as a religious cemetery, then 12the cemetery authority is partially exempt from this Act but 13shall be required to comply with Sections 10-23, 10-40, 10-55, 1410-60, subsections (a), (b), (b-5), (c), (d), (f), (g), and 15(h) of Section 20-5, Sections 20-6, 20-8, 20-10, 20-12, 20-30, 1620-35, 20-40, 25-3, and 25-120, and Article 35 of this Act. 17Cemetery authorities claiming a partial exemption shall apply 18for the partial exemption as provided in Section 10-20 of this 19Act. A cemetery authority that changes to a status that would 20disqualify it from a partial exemption is required to apply 21for licensure within one year following the date on which it 22changes its status. A cemetery authority that maintains a 23partial exemption that fails to timely apply for licensure 24shall be deemed to have engaged in unlicensed practice and 25shall be subject to discipline in accordance with Article 25 26of this Act.  HB1418- 3 -LRB104 07625 AAS 17669 b1    (b-5) A cemetery with an all-volunteer board and an annual 2budget of less than $100,000 shall be partially exempt from 3the requirements of this Act. A cemetery that falls under this 4category shall:5        (1) make available and periodically update maps of the 6    cemetery property that include locations of the graves of 7    individuals in the cemetery;8        (2) post signs in English and Spanish in each cemetery 9    office that contain the Department's consumer hotline 10    number, but does not need the other signage requirements 11    under Section 20-30; and12        (3) post the hours and rules of the cemetery. 13    (c) Nothing in this Act applies to the City of Chicago in 14its exercise of its powers under the O'Hare Modernization Act 15or limits the authority of the City of Chicago to acquire 16property or otherwise exercise its powers under the O'Hare 17Modernization Act, or requires the City of Chicago, or any 18person acting on behalf of the City of Chicago, to comply with 19the licensing, regulation, or investigation requirements of 20this Act in exercising its powers under the O'Hare 21Modernization Act.22    (d) A cemetery manager and customer service employee 23license may be in active status only during the period that 24such a licensee is employed by a cemetery authority that is 25licensed under this Act. In the event that a cemetery manager 26or customer service employee commences work for a cemetery   HB1418- 4 -LRB104 07625 AAS 17669 b1granted an exemption under this Section, it shall be a duty of 2both the cemetery authority and the individual licensee to 3immediately notify the Department so that the license may be 4placed on inactive status. During the period that a license is 5in inactive status, the involved person may not hold himself 6or herself out as licensed. Upon returning to employment by a 7cemetery licensed under this Act, such a cemetery manager or 8customer service employee may reinstate the license to active 9status simply by notifying the Department and paying the 10applicable fee.11(Source: P.A. 102-20, eff. 6-25-21.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.